Maryland, session 2026, SB0717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–926.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) (i) “Sexual assault evidence collection kit” means physical evidence
collected:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0717*

SENATE BILL 717
1. by a qualified health care provider;
2. from the body or clothing of a living or deceased person;
3. following an allegation or suspicion of sexual assault; and
4. for the purpose of preserving the physical evidence.
(ii) “Sexual assault evidence collection kit” does not include a
self–administered sexual assault evidence collection kit.
(e) A sexual assault evidence collection kit shall be submitted to a forensic
laboratory for analysis unless:
(1) there is clear evidence disproving the allegation of sexual assault;
(2) the facts alleged, if true, could not be interpreted to violate a provision
of Title 3, Subtitle 2, Title 3, Subtitle 3, Title 3, Subtitle 6, or Title 11, Subtitle 3 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(3) the victim from whom the evidence was collected declines to give
consent for analysis; or
(4) the suspect’s profile has been collected for entry as a convicted offender
for a qualifying offense in the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) maintained by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the suspect has pleaded guilty to the offense that led
to the sexual assault evidence collection kit.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an investigating law
enforcement agency that receives a sexual assault evidence collection kit shall:
(1) submit the kit and all requested associated reference standards to a
forensic laboratory for analysis within 30 days of receipt of the kit [and all requested
associated reference standards]; and
(2) make use of certified sexual assault crisis programs or other qualified
community–based sexual assault victim service organizations that can provide services and
support to survivors of sexual assault.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.